incubator/apertium-liv-fin/apertium-liv-fin.liv.lexc
LEXICON pronouns

amād:amā PRON_TUBĀ-PL   ; !"XX"
ätsmingi:äts#mingi PRON_TŪĻI   ; !"XX"
eņtš% 1:eņtš PRON_   ; !"oma"
īʼdt|aʼmmõ:īʼdt|aʼmmõ PRON_TUBĀ   ; !"XX"
īʼd|tuoiz:īʼd|tuoiz PRON_NAI   ; !"XX"
ikš% 2:ikš PRON_ĪKŠ   ; !"XX"
īʼž% 1:īʼž PRON_ĪʼŽ   ; !"itse"
īʼžki:īʼžki PRON_SĒMI   ; !"XX"
jegā:jegā PRON_JEGĀ   ; !"joka"
jegā|ikš:jegā|ikš PRON_ĪKŠ   ; !"XX"
kis:kī PRON_KIS   ; !"kuka"
kummi:kummi PRON_TŪĻI   ; !"XX"
kummit:kummit PRON_ĀIGAST   ; !"XX"
ma:ma PRON_MINĀ   ; !"XX"
mēg:m PRON_MĒG   ; !"me"
midāgõd:midāg PRON_MIDĀGÕD   ; !"XX"
midēd:midēd PRON_   ; !"XX"
midēgõd:midēgõd PRON_MIDĀGÕD   ; !"XX"
minā:minā PRON_MINĀ   ; !"XX"
mingi:mingi PRON_TŪĻI   ; !"XX"
mingi:mingi PRON_TŪĻI   ; !"XX"
mingi:mingi PRON_TŪĻI   ; !"XX"
mis:mi PRON_MIS   ; !"mikä"
mitikš:mit#ikš PRON_ĪKŠ   ; !"XX"
mits:mits PRON_MITS   ; !"XX"
mitsmõz:mitsmõz PRON_VĪDÕZ   ; !"XX"
mitsõks:mitsõks PRON_MITS   ; !"XX"
mȯʼlmõd:mȯʼlmõd PRON_AZŪM-PL   ; !"XX"
mū:mū PRON_MŪ   ; !"muu"
mūnda:mūnda PRON_ĀITA   ; !"XX"
mūnda:mūnda PRON_ĀITA   ; !"XX"
ne:n PRON_NE   ; !"he"
sa:sa PRON_SINĀ   ; !"sinä"
se:se PRON_SE   ; !"XX"
seļļi:seļļi PRON_TŪĻI   ; !"sellainen"
seļļi-tūoļi:seļļi-tūoļi PRON_TŪĻI   ; !"XX"
set:set PRON_MITS   ; !"moni"
setmiņ:setmiņ PRON_   ; !"XX"
sinā:sinā PRON_SINĀ   ; !"sinä"
ta:ta PRON_TÄMĀ   ; !"hän"
tämā:tämā PRON_TÄMĀ   ; !"hän"
tēg:t PRON_TĒG   ; !"te"

LEXICON Punctuation


! Clause boundary symbols

%,%<clb%>:%,           # ;
%.%<clb%>:%.           # ;
%.%.%<clb%>:%.%.       # ;
%.%.%.%<clb%>:%.%.%.   # ;
%:%<clb%>:%:           # ;
%;%<clb%>:%;	        # ;
!%<clb%>:%!	    # ;	!^C^
%?%<clb%>:%?	        # ;
…%<clb%>:…		        # ;
¿%<clb%>:¿		        # ;	! Only seen as noise.
¶%<clb%>:¶		        # ;	

 §%<n%>%<abbr%>:§ # ;    ! §:s	!
 §§%<n%>%<abbr%>:§§ # ;  ! §:ain	!
 $%<n%>%<abbr%>:$  # ;    ! $:s	!
 €%<n%>%<abbr%>:€  # ;    ! €:s	!
 £%<n%>%<abbr%>:£  # ;    ! €:s	!
®%<n%>%<abbr%>:® # ;
©%<n%>%<abbr%>:© # ;



•%<punct%>:•	        # ;
-%<punct%>:-           # ; !hyphen
--%<punct%>:--         # ; !double hyphen
–%<punct%>:–           # ; !endash
—%<punct%>:—           # ; !emdash
―%<punct%>:―           # ; ! even emmer dash?
=%<punct%>:=           # ;
&%<punct%>:&           # ;
%<%>%<punct%>:%<%>           # ;
`%<punct%>:`           # ;
´%<punct%>:´           # ;
'%<punct%>:'           # ;

!%%%<punct%>:%%         # ; ! This one causes problems in HFST
!%"%<punct%>:%"         # ;
!%*%<punct%>:%*         # ;
!/%<punct%>:/           # ; 
!%<_-%>%<punct%>:%<_-%>       # ;
!%~%<punct%>:%~	        # ;

! Paired punctuation marks


%"%<punct%>:%"    # ;
%«%<punct%>%<right%>:%«   # ;
%»%<punct%>%<right%>:%»   # ;
%“%<punct%>%<left%>:%“    # ;
%”%<punct%>%<right%>:%”   # ;
%‘%<punct%>%<left%>:%‘    # ;
%’%<punct%>%<right%>:%’   # ;
%‹%<punct%>%<left%>:%‹    # ;
%›%<punct%>%<right%>:%›   # ;
%(%<punct%>%<left%>:%(    # ;
%)%<punct%>%<right%>:%)   # ;
%[%<punct%>%<left%>:%[    # ;
%]%<punct%>%<right%>:%]   # ;
%{%<punct%>%<left%>:%{    # ;
%}%<punct%>%<right%>:%}   # ;
%<%<punct%>%<left%>:%<    # ;
%>%<punct%>%<left%>:%>    # ;


LEXICON A_-ZERO !! modifiers that do not decline
%<a%>: # ;

LEXICON A_
%<a%>%<pos%>:0        CASES   ;
%<a%>%<comp%>:er       CASES   ;
%<a%>%<superl%>:est      CASES   ;

!! !!Stem lexica

LEXICON A_PŪ !!= @CODE@ contains pū: 12
%<a%>:	NMN_PŪ	;

LEXICON A_TĪE !!= @CODE@ contains tīe:tīe 15
%<a%>:	NMN_TĪE	;
	
LEXICON A_BRĪ !!= @CODE@ contains brī:brī 16
%<a%>:	NMN_BRĪ	;
	
LEXICON A_KALĀ  !!= @CODE@ contains  kalā:kaʼlā 18
%<a%>: NMN_KALĀ ;

LEXICON A_TUBĀ !!= @CODE@ tubā:tuʼbā 19
%<a%>:	NMN_TUBĀ	;

LEXICON A_AIGĀ !!= @CODE@ aigā:aigā 20
%<a%>:	CASES	;

LEXICON A_LĒBA !!= @CODE@ lēba:lēba 21
%<a%>:	CASES	;

LEXICON A_IZĀ !!= @CODE@ izā:izā 25
%<a%>:	CASES	;

LEXICON A_OKSĀ !!= @CODE@ oksā:oksā 30
%<a%>:	CASES	;

LEXICON A_ĀIGA !!= @CODE@ āiga:āiga 33
%<a%>:	CASES	;

LEXICON A_SĪLMA !!= @CODE@ sīlma:sīlma 34
%<a%>:	CASES	;

LEXICON A_PADĀ !!= @CODE@ padā:padā 39
%<a%>:	NMN_PADĀ	;

LEXICON A_KÄPĀ !!= @CODE@ käpā:käpā 41
%<a%>:	CASES	;

LEXICON A_MAKSĀ !!= @CODE@ maksā:maksā 42
%<a%>:	CASES	;

LEXICON A_KĒRA !!= @CODE@ kēra:kēra 43
%<a%>:	CASES	;

LEXICON A_JǬRA !!= @CODE@ jǭra:jǭra 44
%<a%>:	CASES	;

LEXICON A_PŪOLA !!= @CODE@ pūola:pūola 45
%<a%>:	CASES	;

LEXICON A_ĀITA !!= @CODE@ āita:āita 46
%<a%>:	CASES	;

LEXICON A_ŪŠKA !!= @CODE@ ūška:ūška 47
%<a%>:	CASES	;

LEXICON A_MȬKA !!= @CODE@ mȭka:mȭka 48
%<a%>:	CASES	;

LEXICON A_DADŽĀ !!= @CODE@ dadžā:dadžā 49
%<a%>:	CASES	;

LEXICON A_TĪERA !!= @CODE@ tīera:tīera 54
%<a%>:	CASES	;

LEXICON A_LILLA !!= @CODE@ kuțā:kuțā 57
%<a%>:	CASES	;

LEXICON A_KUȚĀ
%<a%>:	CASES	;

LEXICON A_KIʼV !!= @CODE@ kiʼv:kiv 59
%<a%>:	CASES	;

LEXICON A_PIʼŅ !!= @CODE@ piʼņ:piņ 64
%<a%>:	CASES	;

LEXICON A_OKŠ !!= @CODE@ : 68
%<a%>:	CASES	;

LEXICON A_KAŠ !!= @CODE@ : 69
%<a%>:	CASES	;

LEXICON A_TORĪ !!= @CODE@ torī: 71
%<a%>:	CASES	;

LEXICON A_KÕʼL !!= @CODE@ kõʼl:kõl 73
%<a%>:	CASES	;

LEXICON A_NIʼM !!= @CODE@ niʼm:nim 76
%<a%>:	CASES	;

LEXICON A_KAND !!= @CODE@ kand: 94
%<a%>:	CASES	;

LEXICON A_UL !!= @CODE@ ul: 99
%<a%>:	CASES	;

LEXICON A_NIŖȚ !!= @CODE@ niŗț: 102
%<a%>:	CASES	;

LEXICON A_DAŅTŠ !!= @CODE@ daņtš: 105
%<a%>:	CASES	;

LEXICON A_TÄUŽ !!= @CODE@ täuž: adres 112
%<a%>:	CASES	;

LEXICON A_SIELDÕ !!= @CODE@ sieldõ: 118
%<a%>:	CASES	;

LEXICON A_NǬʼGÕ !!= @CODE@ nǭʼgõ:nǭgõ 119
%<a%>:	CASES	;

LEXICON A_AŠŠÕ !!= @CODE@ : 120
%<a%>:	CASES	;

LEXICON A_DRŪʼOŠÕ !!= @CODE@ drūʼošõ:drūošõ 121
%<a%>:	CASES	;

LEXICON A_IRM !!= @CODE@ : 125
%<a%>:	CASES	;

LEXICON A_KIM !!= @CODE@ : 126
%<a%>:	CASES	;

LEXICON A_VAʼIT !!= @CODE@ vaʼit:vait 128
%<a%>:	CASES	;

LEXICON A_AMĀT !!= @CODE@ : 129
%<a%>:	CASES	;

LEXICON A_SAʼGDIT !!= @CODE@ saʼgdit:sagdit 131
%<a%>:	CASES	;

LEXICON A_VIĻȚ !!= @CODE@ : 132
%<a%>:	CASES	;

LEXICON A_EĻ !!= @CODE@ eļ: 133
%<a%>:	CASES	;

LEXICON A_BLĒʼḐ !!= @CODE@ blēʼḑ:blēḑ 134
%<a%>:	CASES	;

LEXICON A_FAKT !!= @CODE@ : 135
%<a%>:	CASES	;

LEXICON A_SĪEND !!= @CODE@ sīend: 138
%<a%>:	CASES	;

LEXICON A_LǞʼND !!= @CODE@ lǟʼnd:lǟnd 139
%<a%>:	CASES	;

LEXICON A_ĀIGAST !!= @CODE@ āigast: 140
%<a%>:	CASES	;

LEXICON A_ANALĪZ !!= @CODE@ analīz: 141
%<a%>:	CASES	;

LEXICON A_NĪʼEM !!= @CODE@ nīʼem:nīem 142
%<a%>:	CASES	;

LEXICON A_VIŠ !!= @CODE@ : 144
%<a%>:	CASES	;

LEXICON A_SIDĀM !!= @CODE@ : 157
%<a%>:	NMN_SIDĀM	;

LEXICON A_TŪOITÕG !!= @CODE@ : 158
%<a%>:	CASES	;

LEXICON A_KǬRAND !!= @CODE@ kǭrand: 159
%<a%>:	CASES	;

LEXICON A_ȬʼDÕG !!= @CODE@ ȭʼdõg:ȭdõg 160
%<a%>:	CASES	;

LEXICON A_TAPTÕD !!= @CODE@ taptõd: 161
%<a%>:	CASES	;

LEXICON A_TĪʼEDÕD !!= @CODE@ tīʼedõd:tīedõd 162
%<a%>:	CASES	;

LEXICON A_MĪEZ !!= @CODE@ : 166
%<a%>:	CASES	;

LEXICON A_KÄBRĀZ !!= @CODE@ : 168
%<a%>:	CASES	;

LEXICON A_MAIGĀZ !!= @CODE@ : 169
%<a%>:	CASES	;

LEXICON A_NÕTKĀZ !!= @CODE@ : 170
%<a%>:	CASES	;

LEXICON A_RIKĀZ !!= @CODE@ : 171
%<a%>:	CASES	;

LEXICON A_ĀMBAZ !!= @CODE@ āmbaz:āmba 173
%<a%>:	NMN_ĀMBAZ	;

LEXICON A_PŪŖAZ !!= @CODE@ : 174
%<a%>:	CASES	;

LEXICON A_PǬĻAZ !!= @CODE@ : 175
%<a%>:	CASES	;

LEXICON A_MÕTKÕZ !!= @CODE@ mõtkõz: 179
%<a%>:	CASES	;

LEXICON A_VȬRÕZ !!= @CODE@ vȭrõz: 180
%<a%>:	CASES	;

LEXICON A_ARĀGÕZ !!= @CODE@ : 181
%<a%>:	CASES	;

LEXICON A_ÄʼGGÕZ !!= @CODE@ ä'ggõz:äggõz 182
%<a%>:	CASES	;

LEXICON A_PŪʼDÕZ !!= @CODE@ pūʼdõz:pūdõz 183
%<a%>:	CASES	;

!!= @CODE@ : 186
LEXICON A_SĒJI
%<a%>:	CASES	;
!!= @CODE@ : 187
LEXICON A_AKKIJI
%<a%>:	CASES	;
!!= @CODE@ lē'ji:lēji 188
LEXICON A_LĒʼJI
%<a%>:	CASES	;

LEXICON A_AʼIGI !!= @CODE@ aʼigi:aigi 192
%<a%>:	CASES	;

LEXICON A_PUʼNNI !!= @CODE@ pu'nni:punni 193
%<a%>:	CASES	;
!!= @CODE@ : 194
LEXICON A_KAȚKI
%<a%>:	CASES	;
!!= @CODE@ : 195
LEXICON A_KUKKI
%<a%>:	CASES	;
!!= @CODE@ aigi:aigi 196
LEXICON A_AIGI
%<a%>:	CASES	;
!!= @CODE@ : 197
LEXICON A_OUKI
%<a%>:	CASES	;
!!= @CODE@ : 198
LEXICON A_PAŖĪ
%<a%>:	CASES	;
!!= @CODE@ : 199
LEXICON A_TŪĻI
%<a%>:	CASES	;
!!= @CODE@ aʼbli:abli 200
LEXICON A_AʼBLI
%<a%>:	CASES	;
!!= @CODE@ : 201
LEXICON A_SĒMI
%<a%>:	CASES	;

LEXICON adjectives
ārga:ārga A_ĀIGA   ; !"XX"
aššõ:aššõ A_AŠŠÕ   ; !"XX"
äʼbknaš:äʼb#knaš A_KAŠ   ; !"XX"
blēʼḑ:blēʼḑ A_BLĒʼḐ   ; !"XX"
dōŗa:dōŗa A_JǬRA   ; !"XX"
drūʼošõ:drūʼošõ A_DRŪʼOŠÕ   ; !"XX"
giftig:giftig A_KǬRAND   ; !"XX"
grinā:grinā A_PADĀ   ; !"XX"
ilmõsītõ:ilmõ#sītõ A_NIŖȚ   ; !"XX"
immõrkīerdõd:immõr#kīerdõd A_TAPTÕD   ; !"XX"
jutā:jutā A_KÄPĀ   ; !"XX"
kaʼd:kaʼd A_NIʼM   ; !"XX"
kaʼdstõb:kaʼdstõb A_ȬʼDÕG   ; !"XX"
kaprīz:kaprīz A_ANALĪZ   ; !"XX"
käbrāz:käbrāz A_KÄBRĀZ   ; !"XX"
kīļaz:kīļaz A_PŪŖAZ   ; !"XX"
klīen:klīen A_IRM   ; !"XX"
knap:knap A_KIM   ; !"XX"
knaš:knaš A_KAŠ   ; !"kaunis"
konsekvent:konsekvent A_ĀIGAST   ; !"XX"
kõʼl:kõʼl A_KÕʼL   ; !"XX"
kȭrkaz:kȭrka A_ĀMBAZ   ; !"XX"
kūdklas:kūd#klas A_   ; !"XX"
kūja:kūja A_LĒBA   ; !"XX"
kūldakarrõ:kūlda#karrõ A_-ZERO   ; !"XX"
kuplā:kuplā A_MAKSĀ   ; !"XX"
laigā:laigā A_AIGĀ   ; !"XX"
laigīm:laigīm A_SIDĀM   ; !"XX"
laʼigit:laʼigit A_SAʼGDIT   ; !"XX"
lajā:laʼjā A_KALĀ   ; !"XX"
lāška:lāška A_ŪŠKA   ; !"XX"
läkā:läkā A_KÄPĀ   ; !"XX"
lǟlam:lǟlam A_TŪOITÕG   ; !"XX"
lǟʼnd:lǟʼnd A_LǞʼND   ; !"XX"
lǟʼndzīe:lǟʼndz#īe A_TĪE   ; !"XX"
lem:lem A_KIM   ; !"XX"
leņtš:leņtš A_DAŅTŠ   ; !"XX"
lindbrī:lind#brī A_BRĪ   ; !"XX"
līngaz:līngaz A_NÕTKĀZ   ; !"XX"
lītnēji:līt#nēji A_SĒJI   ; !"XX"
lodžā:lodžā A_DADŽĀ   ; !"XX"
loʼḑ:loʼḑ A_PIʼŅ   ; !"XX"
loʼḑ:loʼḑ A_PIʼŅ   ; !"XX"
lomākõz:lomākõz A_ARĀGÕZ   ; !"XX"
lumīzvālda:lumīz#vālda A_ĀITA   ; !"XX"
luoik:luoik A_KAND   ; !"XX"
lūos:lūos A_FAKT   ; !"XX"
maigāz:maigāz A_MAIGĀZ   ; !"XX"
makstõd:makstõd A_TAPTÕD   ; !"XX"
mieʼddi:mieʼddi A_   ; !"XX"
miklā:miklā A_MAKSĀ   ; !"XX"
modǟrn:modǟrn A_ĀIGAST   ; !"XX"
mõʼŗžiji:mõʼŗžiji A_LĒʼJI   ; !"XX"
mūodzig:mūodzig A_KǬRAND   ; !"XX"
mūrdamõt:mūrdamõt A_-ZERO   ; !"XX"
nǭļaz:nǭļaz A_PǬĻAZ   ; !"XX"
nõrī:nõrī A_TORĪ   ; !"XX"
nȭrka:nȭrka A_ĀITA   ; !"XX"
nõrkõn:nõrkõn A_ÄʼGGÕZ   ; !"XX"
nȭŗkaz:nȭŗka A_ĀMBAZ   ; !"XX"
nõtkāz:nõtkāz A_NÕTKĀZ   ; !"XX"
ǭļaz:ǭļaz A_PǬĻAZ   ; !"vihreä"
ǭra:ǭra A_JǬRA   ; !"XX"
ouki:ouki A_OUKI   ; !"XX"
oʼvstõd:oʼvstõd A_TĪʼEDÕD   ; !"XX"
õʼbdõkǭrali:õʼbdõ#kǭrali A_AʼBLI   ; !"XX"
ȭgiji:ȭgiji A_AKKIJI   ; !"XX"
pai:pai A_BRĪ   ; !"XX"
paralel:paralel A_AMĀT   ; !"XX"
parām:parām A_SIDĀM   ; !"XX"
paŗī:paŗī A_PAŖĪ   ; !"XX"
pīʼemdõ:pīʼemdõ A_NǬʼGÕ   ; !"XX"
pīʼep:pīʼep A_VAʼIT   ; !"XX"
piški:piški A_KAȚKI   ; !"pieni"
pivā:piʼvā A_TUBĀ   ; !"XX"
pǭr:pǭr A_IRM   ; !"XX"
pozitīv:pozitīv A_ANALĪZ   ; !"XX"
pȭda:pȭda A_MȬKA   ; !"XX"
priš:priš A_VIŠ   ; !"XX"
pūʼdõz:pūʼdõz A_PŪʼDÕZ   ; !"XX"
pūoltäuž:pūol#täuž A_TÄUŽ   ; !"XX"
pūoltīʼedõd:pūol#tīʼedõd A_TĪʼEDÕD   ; !"XX"
raʼnk:raʼnk A_NĪʼEM   ; !"XX"
reāl:reāl A_AMĀT   ; !"XX"
rikāz:rikāz A_RIKĀZ   ; !"XX"
rīț:rīț A_VIĻȚ   ; !"XX"
roppi:roppi A_KUKKI   ; !"XX"
roʼvvõdvaʼili:roʼvvõd#vaʼili A_SĒMI   ; !"XX"
rōza:rōza A_LILLA   ; !"XX"
rȭskõ:rȭskõ A_SIELDÕ   ; !"XX"
rubīžaʼigi:rubīž#aʼigi A_AʼIGI   ; !"XX"
rušk:rušk A_FAKT   ; !"XX"
saksā:saksā A_OKSĀ   ; !"XX"
saņț:saņț A_NIŖȚ   ; !"XX"
sīend:sīend A_SĪEND   ; !"XX"
siʼnvannʼit:siʼn#vannʼit A_SAʼGDIT   ; !"XX"
sitkõz:sitkõz A_MÕTKÕZ   ; !"XX"
smouļ:smouļ A_VIĻȚ   ; !"XX"
soʼugdõ:soʼugdõ A_NǬʼGÕ   ; !"XX"
spīʼḑiji:spīʼḑiji A_KUȚĀ   ; !"XX"
spitš:spitš A_OKŠ   ; !"XX"
sūŗim:sūŗim A_TŪOITÕG   ; !"XX"
škīelsīlma:škīel#sīlma A_SĪLMA   ; !"XX"
täuž:täuž A_TÄUŽ   ; !"täysi"
tīera:tīera A_TĪERA   ; !"XX"
tiʼg:tiʼg A_KIʼV   ; !"XX"
tǭʼdõb:tǭʼdõb A_ȬʼDÕG   ; !"XX"
toļp:toļp A_KAND   ; !"XX"
toņ:toņ A_EĻ   ; !"XX"
tõvā:tõʼvā A_TUBĀ   ; !"syvä"
tumšõ:tumšõ A_AŠŠÕ   ; !"pimeä"
tūorõz:tūorõ A_VȬRÕZ   ; !"XX"
uidi:uidi A_AIGI   ; !"XX"
ukkõlǟʼnd:ukkõ#lǟʼnd A_LǞʼND   ; !"XX"
ul:ul A_UL   ; !"XX"
umbi:umbi A_TŪĻI   ; !"XX"
uʼmmi:uʼmmi A_PUʼNNI   ; !"XX"
ūnd:ūnd A_SĪEND   ; !"XX"
vabā:vabā A_PADĀ   ; !"XX"
vabāilā:vabā#iʼlā A_KALĀ   ; !"XX"
vagāmīez:vagā#mīe A_MĪEZ   ; !"XX"
vaigā:vaigā A_AIGĀ   ; !"XX"
vaʼldziklilla:vaʼldzik#lilla A_LILLA   ; !"XX"
vēļa:vēļa A_KĒRA   ; !"XX"
viʼl:viʼl A_NIʼM   ; !"viileä"
viš:viš A_VIŠ   ; !"XX"
vizā:vizā A_IZĀ   ; !"XX"
vȯitõ:vȯitõ A_SIELDÕ   ; !"XX"
vȭrõmǭ:vȭrõ#mǭ A_PŪ   ; !"XX"
